Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3310.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; THE SANNEH FOUNDATION.new text end new text begin $375,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $375,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the commissioner of administration for grants to The Sanneh Foundation to help support family nutritional distribution in the seven-county metropolitan area and create senior community programming and multicultural women's athletic programming. new text end